Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 20. Government Departments
§ 9-2-2012.
Department of corrections created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming department of corrections consisting of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section. The provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor.

The following agencies are assigned to the department of corrections under a Type 1 transfer:

Department of probation and parole;

The following state institutions:

Wyoming state penitentiary, including farms and camps operated by the board of charities and reform for the incarceration of persons convicted of felonies;

Wyoming women’s center.

The board of charities and reform, including the community correctional facilities program, the split sentencing program and any other remaining programs under the board.

The board of parole shall be deemed a state agency for budgeting purposes pursuant to W.S.

9-2-1001

.1 through

9-2-1014

.2.

The board of land commissioners shall direct, subject to the limitations contained in the constitution of the state of Wyoming, applicable state and federal law and the conveyance instrument, the control, leasing, exchange, care and disposal of all acquired institutional lands not directly utilized for departmental purposes that are managed or associated with the institutions set forth in W.S. 9-2-2012(c) whether held in the name of the state or in the name of the department. Any amount received from transactions involving these lands shall be credited as directed by state or federal law or the conveyance instrument.

All lands managed by the board of land commissioners subject to subsection (e) of this section shall be managed consistent with:

Consideration of the needs of the institution;

Consideration of alternative uses of the property which are compatible with the mission of the institution; and

Limitations contained in the constitution of the state of Wyoming, state and federal law and the conveyance instrument.

The board of land commissioners shall consult with the local officials or governing body having regulatory authority over the acquired institutional lands prior to authorizing the use or transfer of acquired institutional lands managed under subsection (e) of this section to another agency or department of the state of Wyoming.

As used in this section, “acquired institutional lands” means state lands acquired by the state for the benefit of state institutions, but shall not include school trust lands or other lands held in trust by the state of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 222, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-2009

; 2003, ch. 127, § 1; 2007, ch. 215, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2013 ch. 155, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2021 ch. 56, § 3, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

in (b), deleted “not later than July 1, 1990” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second through sixth sentences pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added (e) to (h).

The 2021 amendment,

in (d), substituted “9-2-1001.1” for “9-2-1001” and “9-2-1014.2” for “9-2-1026.”

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2013, ch. 155, §
2,
directs: “The director of the office of state lands,
in consultation
with the directors of the departments of corrections,
family services
and health shall submit a report to the board of
land commissioners
and the joint minerals, business and economic
development interim
committee identifying lands that will be managed
by the board of land
commissioners pursuant to this act by October
1, 2013. The report
shall also identify the potential best use for
each managed property
consistent with the management considerations
required by this act.”

§ 9-2-2013.
Department of environmental quality created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the department of environmental quality consisting of the existing state department of environmental quality, the state office of industrial siting administration and the industrial siting council. Except for the existing environmental quality council, which shall not be within the department of environmental quality but shall be a separate operating agency, and those programs or functions specified by law to be performed by another entity all programs and functions specified in chapters 11 and 12 of title 35 shall be with the department of environmental quality. Except for W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(v) and (ix), the limitation of number of principal departments contained in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(iii), 9-2-1704(a) and (b), 9-2-1706(c)(i)(D) and

9-2-1707

(a)(iii) and (iv), the provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The director shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate.

The department shall not be subject to a transition period as defined in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(ix). A reorganization plan shall not be required of the director.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 60, § 2; 2007, ch. 215, § 1.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a) substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved July 1, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 1992, chs. 42 and 55, also enacted a §

9-2-2013

. See §§

9-2-2014

and

9-2-2015

and notes thereto.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 4, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-2-2014.
Wyoming water development office created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government there is created the Wyoming water development office consisting of the programs and functions specified in this section.

The administrative head of the office shall be a director appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The director’s term of appointment shall expire at the end of the term of office of the governor during which he was appointed, unless sooner removed.

The Wyoming water development office shall consist of the Wyoming water development commission, staff and programs.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 42, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-2013

.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

9-2-2013

. As a §

9-2-2013

was also enacted by Laws 1992, chs. 55 and 60, this section has been redesignated as §

9-2-2014

. See, also, §§ 9-2-2013 and

9-2-2015

and notes thereto.

§ 9-2-2015.
Office of state lands and investments; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government there is created the state land and farm loan office consisting of the programs and functions specified in this section. From and after April 1, 1997, the state land and farm loan office shall be known and referred to as the office of state lands and investments.

The administrative head of the office shall be a director appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The director shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by the governor as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

.

The office of state lands and investments shall consist of the office of the director and shall administer all programs of the board of land commissioners and state loan and investment board.

History.

Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-2013

; 1997, ch. 195, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

This section was enacted as §

9-2-2013

. As a §

9-2-2013

was also enacted by Laws 1992, chs. 42 and 60, this section has been renumbered as §

9-2-2015

. See, also, §§ 9-2-2013 and

9-2-2014

.

Task force. —

Laws 2005, ch. 235, §§ 1 and 2, as amended by Laws 2006, ch. 93, § 1, creates a legislative-executive task force to review funding for the office of state lands and investments' trust programs. The task force is to: (1) familiarize itself with the trust responsibilities of the office of state lands and investments; (2) conduct a comprehensive review of the office of state lands and investments' budget and its expenditures for trust responsibilities to determine if any change to the budgeted funding of the office of state lands and investments' trust responsibilities is necessary; (3) conduct a comprehensive review, by source, of the relationship of administrative costs to revenues of the office of state lands and investments' trust programs to determine if any change to the budgeted funding of the office of state lands and investments' trust responsibilities is necessary; (4) no later than June 1, 2006, prepare and submit a report to the legislature, which details the task force's findings, recommends whether any change in the manner or source of funding for the office of state lands and investments' trust responsibilities is necessary, recommend any preferable alternatives for funding trust responsibilities; and (5) no later than September 1, 2006, recommend to the joint agriculture, public lands and water resources interim committee and the joint appropriations interim committee any statutory changes that may be required to implement the task force's final recommendations. This act terminates April 1, 2007. The act appropriates $30,000 from the general fund to the office of state lands and investments to fund interim meetings and activities of the task force and to contract with appropriate professionals as necessary to complete the duties assigned to the task force. Laws 2006, ch. 93, § 2, appropriates an additional $20,000 to fund interim meetings and activities of the task force and to contract with appropriate professionals as necessary to complete the duties assigned to the task force.

Laws 2005, ch. 235, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 11, 2005.

Laws 2006, ch. 93, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

§ 9-2-2016.
Department of agriculture created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the department of agriculture consisting of the existing state department of agriculture, the agricultural mediation board, the wheat marketing commission, the Wyoming beef council, the Wyoming weed and pest council, the board of certification of the Environmental Pesticide Control Act of 1973, the weed and pest board of certification, the interstate agricultural grain marketing commission, the state fair advisory board and all programs and functions specified in titles 11 and 35 and otherwise under law relating to agriculture and livestock. Except for W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(v) and (ix), the limitation of number of principal departments in W.S. 9-2-1704(a) and

9-2-1707

(a)(iii) and (iv), the provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director who shall serve at the pleasure of the governor and may be removed by him as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The director shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate.

The department shall not be subject to a transition period as defined in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(ix). A reorganization plan shall not be required of the director.

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 191, § 2; 2008, ch. 116, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708” in (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

Task Force. —

Laws 2006, ch. 91, § 1, creates an executive task force for the study of Wyoming bio-security laboratory issues and to coordinate between Wyoming and other state and federal agencies.

Laws 2006, ch. 91, § 2, appropriates one hundred thousand dollars to the Wyoming department of agriculture to fund interim meetings and activities of the task force.

§ 9-2-2017.
Department of state parks and cultural resources created; director appointed; structure.

There is created the Wyoming department of state parks and cultural resources consisting of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor not later than July 1, 1999, with the advice and consent of the senate. The director may, with the approval of the governor, appoint administrators for each of the divisions. The governor may remove the director and division administrators as provided in W.S.

9-1-202

. The director may employ professional, technical and other assistants to work in the director’s office or in any of the divisions, along with other employees, as authorized by the legislature, to carry out the duties of the department.

The following agencies are assigned to the department of state parks and cultural resources under a Type 1 transfer:

The division of state parks and historic sites from the department of commerce;

The parks and cultural resources commission;

The division of cultural resources from the department of commerce;

The Wyoming council on the arts from the department of commerce;

The division of administrative services from the department of commerce;

The Wyoming pioneer memorial museum from the department of agriculture.

As used in this section:

“Commerce” means the department of commerce;

“Governor” means the office of the governor;

“State parks and cultural resources” means the department of state parks and cultural resources created by this section.

The following divisions are created within the department of state parks and cultural resources:

Division of parks and historic sites;

Division of cultural resources.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 69, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 25, §§ 1, 2, directed and authorized the board of land commissioners to convey its right, title and interest, in described parcels of land to the department of state parks and cultural resources and the game and fish commission. There was appropriated an amount not to exceed six million dollars ($6,000,000.00) from the budget reserve account to the state land board for the period beginning with the effective date of the act and ending June 30, 2008 for purposes of funding the purchases.

§ 9-2-2018.
Department of workforce services created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the Wyoming department of workforce services. The provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

apply to this section, except the requirement under W.S.

9-2-1707

(a)(iii) that public hearings regarding the reorganization plan required under subsection (b) of this section be conducted by at least two (2) interim committees of the legislature shall not apply.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor.

The department reorganization plan shall consider whether the following functions or programs are assigned from or to the agency or department specified under a Type 2 transfer:

PROGRAM; FROM; TO

Displaced worker education and training; Employment; Workforce services

Division of vocational rehabilitation; Employment; Workforce services

Public employment offices; Employment; Workforce services

Veterans’ employment services; Employment; Workforce services

Unemployment insurance program; Employment; Workforce services

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 11, § 2.

Senior community service employment program; Health; Workforce services

Wyoming school-to-careers program; Employment; Workforce services

Personal opportunities with employment responsibilities (POWER) program; Family services; Workforce services

Workforce development training fund; Employment; Workforce services

Supplemental nutrition assistance employment program; Family services; Workforce services

Other programs that may be identified that may improve customer satisfaction or reduce program delivery costs.

As used in this section:

“Community college commission” means the community college commission of Wyoming;

“Education” means the department of education;

“Employment” means the department of employment;

“Family services” means the department of family services;

“Governor” means the office of the governor;

“Health” means the department of health;

“Workforce services” means the department of workforce services created by this section.

In developing the plan required under W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii), the director shall consider:

The cost-effectiveness of any recommended transfer;

Whether the recommended transfer will result in a more efficient provision of service to customers;

The extent to which the recommended transfer would benefit from involvement by the Wyoming business council;

Developing a system that will adequately serve customers in both urban and rural areas;

Recommending legislation necessary to allow data sharing for the purpose of evaluating programs and the sharing of a common intake and management information system;

Identifying outcome-based data for all workforce programs, including those programs not proposed for transfer to the department of workforce services under this section;

Developing memoranda of understanding for confidentiality of information and data sharing.

To the extent not prohibited by federal law, any agency or program of the state may provide information to the director as necessary to develop the plan required under W.S. 9-2-1707(a)(iii).

The governor may:

Eliminate any council or commission within the department which is not created under state law if no longer required as a condition to receiving federal funds or if no longer necessary to conform with federal law or regulations;

Consolidate any council or commission within the department which is required in accordance with federal law, but not created under state law, with any other council or commission if the consolidation does not violate federal law or regulations.

Information obtained by any division in the department may be transferred to other divisions within the department so long as the transfer is not restricted by federal law, rule or contract. Such information shall not be disclosed outside of the department except as otherwise provided by law. Any employee who discloses information outside of the department in violation of federal or state law may be terminated without progressive discipline.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 187, § 1; 2006, ch. 11, § 2; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; ch. 116, §
1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; 2013 ch. 193, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, repealed former (c)(vi), which read: “Adult education and literacy; Community college commission; Workforce services.”

The 2008 amendments. —

The first 2008 amendment, by ch. 44, §
1, in (b), deleted “not later than July 1, 1990” at the end of the first sentence, and deleted the former second through sixth sentences pertaining to various reporting requirements to the legislature and legislative committees; and in (e)(vi), deleted “Upon approval of the plan by the legislature, the director shall submit a report to the governor and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee no later than October 1 of each year thereafter addressing the results of such program evaluations;” and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The second 2008 amendment, by ch. 116, §
1, substituted “9-2-1707” for “9-2-1708” in (a).

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (g) and (h).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “Supplemental nutrition assistance employment program” for “Food stamp employment program” in (c)(xi).

Editor's note. —

Laws 2006, ch. 11, § 3, states: “Effective July 1, 2006, the adult basic education program and the general educational development program shall be transferred from the department of workforce services to the community college commission. All positions, property and appropriated funds associated with these programs shall be transferred from the department to the commission. In addition, all rules and regulations promulgated by the department pertaining to both programs shall remain in effect and unaltered as rules and regulations of the commission until amended or repealed by the commission.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-2-2019.
Department of enterprise technology services created.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the department of enterprise technology services consisting of the existing division of information technology within the department of administration and information and the position and office of state chief information officer. The department shall not be subject to a transition period as defined in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(ix). A reorganization plan shall not be required of the director.

History.

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 2.

Effective date. —

Laws 2012, ch. 30, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2012.

§ 9-2-2020.
State construction department created.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the state construction department consisting of the existing construction management program within the department of administration and information, associated construction management functions of the department of administration and information, and the school facilities department. The state construction department shall not be subject to a transition period as defined in W.S. 9-2-1703(a)(ix). A reorganization plan shall not be required of the director.

History.

2016 ch. 105, § 2, effective July 1, 2016.

Effective date. —

Laws 2016, ch. 105, § 5, makes the act effective July 1, 2016.

§ 9-2-2021.
State budget department created; director appointed; structure.

As part of the reorganization of Wyoming state government, there is created the state budget department consisting of the existing budget division of the department of administration and information. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the provisions of the Wyoming Government Reorganization Act of 1989, W.S.

9-2-1701

through

9-2-1707

, shall apply to this section.

The administrative head of the department shall be a director appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Not later than May 1, 2020, the governor shall appoint a director in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

(b). Thereafter, appointments for the director of the state budget department shall be in accordance with W.S.

28-12-101

through

28-12-103

.

Not later than August 15, 2020, the director shall prepare a plan for reorganization of the agencies, programs and functions specified in this section and submit it to the governor for approval. The director shall include in the reorganization plan recommendations regarding any necessary modifications to state budgeting statutes and other statutes relating to the duties of the state budget department.

After the governor approves the plan for reorganization developed pursuant to this section:

The governor shall, when he deems appropriate, set a schedule for implementation of the reorganization plan;

The joint appropriations committee shall develop any necessary legislation with respect to the plan and monitor the state budget department’s work and progress.

Upon submission of the reorganization plan developed pursuant to this section, the state budget department shall have authority provided by law to the budget division within the department of administration and information and shall operate independently of the department of administration and information.

The state budget department shall be subject to the direction of the existing administrator of the budget division of the department of administration and information who shall serve as the director of the state budget department until the governor appoints a director in accordance with this section.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 5.

The budget division of the department of administration and information is assigned to the state budget department under a Type 1 transfer, effective upon the appointment of a director of the state budget department.

The governor may allocate personnel and other resources between the department of administration and information and the state budget department in accordance with a Type 1 transfer. Nothing in this subsection shall authorize the state budget department to gain positions or funds in addition to the positions and funds currently allocated to the budget division of the department of administration and information.

Upon the appointment of a director of the state budget department, the state budget department shall pursue state savings and efficiency initiatives identified in 2017 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 183 and 2018 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 112 and identified by the government efficiency commission created by 2017 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 183 and continued by 2018 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 112.

History.

2020 ch. 115, § 1, effective March 17, 2020; 2021 ch. 56, § 5, effective April 1, 2021.

The 2021 amendment

repealed (g), which read, "The director of the state budget department shall have the authority to: (i) Employ professional, technical and other assistants to work in the director’s office, along with other employees necessary to carry out the purpose of this act; (ii) Adopt reasonable rules and regulations to administer this section pursuant to the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act; (iii) Formulate through his office the policies and programs to be carried out by the department."

Laws 2021, ch. 56, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved April 1, 2021.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 17, 2020.